Utah statutes.
17-27a-524.   Site plan.

A site plan submitted to a county for approval of a building permit:

(1)   if modified, may not be used to impose a penalty on a property owner;

(2)  does not represent an agreement for a specific final layout;

(3)  does not bind an owner from future development activity or modifications to a development activity on the property; and

(4)  is superceded by the terms of a building permit requirement.



Enacted by Chapter 476, 2013 General Session

